Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.370

Vacancies.

(1) In case of a vacancy from any cause on the board of directors of a school district other than a reconstituted board resulting from reorganized school districts, a majority of the legally established number of board members shall fill such vacancy by appointment: PROVIDED, That should there exist fewer board members on the board of directors of a school district than constitutes a majority of the legally established number of board members, the educational service district board members of the district in which the school district is located by the vote of a majority of its legally established number of board members shall appoint a sufficient number of board members to constitute a legal majority on the board of directors of such school district; and the remaining vacancies on such board of directors shall be filled by such board of directors in accordance with the provisions of this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That should any board of directors for whatever reason fail to fill a vacancy within ninety days from the creation of such vacancy, the members of the educational service district board of the district in which the school district is located by majority vote shall fill such vacancy.

(2) Appointees to fill vacancies on boards of directors of school districts shall meet the requirements provided by law for school directors and shall serve until the next regular school district election, at which time a successor shall be elected for the unexpired term.

(3) If a vacancy will be created by a board member who has submitted a resignation, that board member may not vote on the selection of his or her replacement.

[ 1991 c 60 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 100; 1971 c 53 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 156; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.326. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 292 s 12; RRS 4801; prior: 1907 c 31 s 3; 1897 c 118 s 89; 1890 p 390 s 16. Formerly RCW 28.62.120. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 298 s 3; RRS s 4813. Formerly RCW 28.63.020. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 301 s 3; RRS s 4825. Formerly RCW 28.63.022. (iv) 1959 c 216 s 7, part; 1955 c 157 s 14, part; prior: 1909 p 281 s 4, part; 1903 c 104 s 14, part; 1899 c 142 s 6, part; 1897 c 118 s 33, part; 1891 c 127 s 3, part; 1890 p 355 s 11, part; RRS s 4770, part. Formerly RCW 28A.315.530, 28A.57.326, 28.19.060, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 c 53: See note following RCW 28A.323.060.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.